Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 2 Creation, Administration, and Management of the Assets of the Fund

47-16-20.
Creation of the fund and the board of commissioners.

There is created a retirement fund, to be known as the “Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia,” and a board to administer this fund, to be known as the “Board of Commissioners of the Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia.”

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 1.

47-16-21.
Membership of the board.

The board shall consist of six members as follows:

The state treasurer;

One former sheriff who is receiving benefits as a retired beneficiary of the fund; and

Four persons holding office as sheriffs of Georgia, each of whom shall be active members of the fund and shall have held office as a sheriff for at least four years.

The state treasurer shall begin serving on the board on July 1, 1984. The position of the state treasurer on the board shall be the successor to the position on the board held by the president of the Association County Commissioners of Georgia, which shall stand abolished on June 30, 1984.

The term of office of the retired member of the board holding office on January 1, 1984, which is scheduled to expire on March 31, 1984, is extended to expire on June 30, 1984. The Governor shall appoint a successor, pursuant to the position provided for by paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section, to take office on July 1, 1984, for a term of one year and until a successor is appointed and qualified. Thereafter, the Governor shall appoint a successor pursuant to the position provided for by paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section to take office upon the expiration of the term of office for a term of two years and until a successor is appointed and qualified.

The first four members of the board provided for by paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed by the Governor to take office on July 1, 1984. Such members shall be successors to Sheriffs D. Lamar Stewart, E. W. Phillips, Wesley Walraven, and Franklin Thornton whose terms of office as members of the board shall terminate on June 30, 1984. Their successors shall be appointed by the Governor for initial terms of office as follows:

The member appointed as the successor to Sheriff D. Lamar Stewart shall be appointed for a term of one year;

The member appointed as the successor to Sheriff E. W. Phillips shall be appointed for a term of two years;

The member appointed as the successor to Sheriff Wesley Walraven shall be appointed for a term of three years; and

The member appointed as the successor to Sheriff Franklin Thornton shall be appointed for a term of four years.

Beginning in 1985, the Governor shall annually appoint a successor to the member of the board appointed pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section whose respective term of office is expiring. Each such successor shall be appointed by the Governor for a term of four years and until a successor is appointed and qualified. Thereafter, successors shall be appointed by the Governor upon the expiration of the respective terms of office for terms of four years and until such successors are appointed and qualified.

Any appointed member of the board continuing to meet the respective qualifications for membership on the board shall be eligible for reappointment to successive terms as a member of the board. If a member of the board holding a position specified by paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section ceases to hold office as sheriff for any reason, except for retirement as a beneficiary of the fund, such member’s position on the board shall thereby become vacant; but, if any such member retires to become a beneficiary of the fund during a term of office, such member may serve until the expiration of the term to which the member was appointed. A vacancy which occurs for any reason in the membership of the board shall be filled as follows:

If the vacancy is in the position specified by paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section, the Governor shall appoint a qualified person to fill such vacancy for the unexpired term; and

If the vacancy is in a position specified by paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section, the remaining members of the board shall elect a qualified person to fill such vacancy for the unexpired term.

By a majority vote of its full membership the board shall elect a chairman from the membership of the board. The chairman shall serve for a term fixed by rules of the board.

The Georgia Sheriffs’ Association shall be authorized to submit the names of nominees for each position on the board appointed by the Governor pursuant to this Code section. The Governor may consider the nominees made by the Georgia Sheriffs’ Association in making such appointments, but it is specifically provided that all such appointments shall be at the sole discretion of the Governor, and the Governor shall not be required to make any appointments from nominees made by the Georgia Sheriffs’ Association.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 2; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1203, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 830, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 645, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1185, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 507, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 514, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 535, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “state treasurer” for “director of the Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” in paragraph (a)(1) and twice in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 507, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that that Act, which amended this Code section, shall become effective June 30, 1984, except that it shall become effective upon the date of the Governor’s approval (March 15, 1984) for the administrative purpose of allowing the Governor to consider appointments pursuant to the revised language of §

47-16-21

.

47-16-22.
Quorum for conduct of business by the board; records of meetings of the board.

Three members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of business by the board.

The board shall keep records of all its meetings.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, §§ 2, 3.

47-16-23.
Compensation and expenses of members of the board.

All members of the board shall serve without pay but shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in attending meetings and performing the duties required of them as members of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 2.

47-16-24.
Creation of the office of secretary-treasurer; periodic reports of moneys in hand, receipts, and expenditures; performance bond.

There is created the office of secretary-treasurer of the Board of Commissioners of the Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia, who shall be elected and appointed by the board and shall serve at its pleasure. His compensation shall be fixed by the board. He shall have such power and authority and shall perform such duties and services as the board may direct.

The secretary-treasurer shall make quarterly reports to the board showing the total amount of moneys in his hands at the time such report is made and also showing a full accounting of receipts and expenditures since his last quarterly report.

The secretary-treasurer shall give a good and sufficient surety bond in an amount to be determined by the board. The bond shall be made payable to the board and shall be contingent upon the proper and faithful performance of his duties as secretary-treasurer.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, §§ 7, 8; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1688, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1060, §§ 1, 2.

47-16-25.
Powers and duties of the board generally.

The board shall have the power and duty to:

Provide for the collection of all moneys;

Provide for the payment of all administrative expenses;

Hear and decide all applications for retirement benefits under this chapter;

Provide for the payment of all retirement benefits that may be determined to be due under this chapter and lawful rules and regulations as adopted by the board;

Make all necessary rules and regulations not inconsistent with law for the operation of the fund;

Determine and fix rules of eligibility for retirement benefits under this chapter; and

Provide for refunds and repayments to persons who may be entitled to receive them.

The board shall have all other powers necessary for the proper administration of the fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 3; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1203, § 2.

47-16-26.
Power of board to control, invest, and expend funds; gifts, grants, or bequests; deposit of funds received by the board; payment of benefits and administrative expenses.

The board shall have control over the funds provided for in this chapter, authority to expend such funds in accordance with this chapter, and authority to invest the funds subject to all terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by Article 7 of Chapter 20 of this title, the “Public Retirement Systems Investment Authority Law.”

The board may take, by gift, grant, or bequest, any money, real or personal property, or any other things of value and may hold, invest, sell, or otherwise dispose of the same for the uses and purposes of the fund in accordance with this chapter.

All funds received by the board shall be deposited in a special account to the credit of the board.

Benefits under this chapter and all administrative expenses shall be paid from such funds.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 925, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 534, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 966, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 11.

47-16-27.
Duty of board to keep records of accounts and operations; presentation of annual financial statement to Georgia Sheriffs’ Association.

The board shall keep accurate permanent records of all persons who qualify to participate in the fund and shall keep accurate permanent records of all its accounts in granting retirement benefits and of all payments, disbursements, and investments. It shall also keep proper detailed records of all its acts and operations.

The board shall present each year at the annual convention of the Georgia Sheriffs’ Association a financial statement of the fund for the preceding year.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 4; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1203, § 3.

47-16-28.
Duty of state auditor to make an annual audit and report of the operations of the board; right of state auditor to audit the affairs of the board; contents of annual report.

The state auditor is authorized and directed to make an annual audit of the operations of the board and to make a complete report of that audit to the General Assembly. The state auditor shall not
be required to distribute copies of
the report to
the
members
of
the General Assembly but shall notify the members of
the availability of the report in the manner which he or she deems to be most effective and efficient. The report shall disclose all moneys received by the board and all expenditures made by it, including administrative expenses and payments of benefits. The state auditor shall also have the right, in his or her discretion, to audit the affairs of the board at any time, and he or she may also audit the affairs of the board at any time, upon request of a majority of the members of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 9; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1203, § 4; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 35/SB 49.

47-16-29.
Increases in maximum monthly benefit payable under Article 6 of this chapter.

Subject to the terms and limitations of this Code section, the board of commissioners is authorized to adopt from time to time a method or methods of providing for increases in the maximum monthly retirement benefit payable under Article 6 of this chapter for persons theretofore or thereafter retiring under this chapter. Such method shall be based upon:

The recommendation of the actuary of the board of commissioners;

The maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted by the board; and

Such other factors as the board deems relevant.

Any such increase may be uniform or may vary in accordance with the time of retirement, length of service, age, nature of the retirement, or such other factors as the board of commissioners shall determine.

An initial increase may be granted pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section to become effective on July 1, 1993, not to exceed 3 percent of the maximum monthly retirement benefit then in effect. Thereafter, such increases may be authorized effective as of January 1 and July 1 of each year; provided, however, that no such increase shall exceed 1 1/2 percent of the maximum monthly retirement benefit then in effect.

No increase shall be made pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section to become effective within six months of the effective date of any increase in the maximum retirement benefit granted by the General Assembly through amendment of Code Section 47-16-101.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-16-29

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 608, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 66/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “board of commissioners” for “board of trustees” three times in subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”